src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
!! neutral to vowel height and backness
NeutrVowHeight = [(%^VOWLower: |%^VOWRaise:)] ;

NeutrDiphPALTint = [(%^PALÄ: |%^PALE: |%^PALẸ: |%^PALÕ: |%^PALÂ: |%^PALI:)] ;


!! possible triggers before PALE PALÄ
NeutrVowLengthHeight = [ NeutrVowLength NeutrVowHeight] ;

NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphTint = [NeutrVowLength NeutrVowHeight NeutrDiphPALTint ] ;

!! possible triggers between stem and PALNo and PAL
BetweenStemAndPALNo = [ NeutrVowLength NeutrVowHeight NeutrDiphPALTint (%^Allegro:) ] ;     


!! possible triggers between vowel length and consonant grade

NeutrVowHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL = [ NeutrVowHeight NeutrDiphPALTint (%^Allegro:) (%^PALNo: | %^PAL:) ] ;     

!! `NeutrVowHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL = [ (%^VOWRaise:\|%^VOWLower:) ( ((%^PALÂ:\|%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PALNo:\|%^VOWLower: %^PALÄ:\|(%^PALÕ:\|%^PALE:\|%^PALÄ:\|%^PALẸ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PAL:)\| (%^Allegro:) (%^PALÕ:\|%^PALE:\|%^PALÄ:\|%^PALẸ:\|%^PALÂ:) (%^PALNo:\](%^PAL:) ) ) ;`

! [ (NeutrVowHeight ((%^PALÂ: |%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PALNo: |%^VOWLower: %^PALÄ: |(%^PALÕ: |%^PALE: |%^PALÄ: |%^PALẸ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PAL:)| (%^Allegro:) (%^PALÕ: |%^PALE: |%^PALÄ: |%^PALẸ: |%^PALÂ:) (%^PALNo: |%^PAL:) ) ] ;

!! possible triggers between word end and consonant grade
NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL = [ NeutrVowLength NeutrVowHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL ];     


!! possible triggers between vowel length and Palatalization
BetweenVowLengthAndPALNo = [NeutrVowHeight NeutrDiphPALTint ] ;
!! `BetweenVowLengthAndPALNo = [(%^VOWLower:\|%^VOWRaise:) (%^PALÄ:\|%^PALE:\|%^PALẸ:\|%^PALÕ:\](%^PALÂ:) ) ;`

BetweenVowHeightAndConsGrade = [(NeutrDiphPALTint (%^Allegro:) %^PAL: |(%^PALÂ: |%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PALNo:)] ;
!! `BetweenVowHeightAndConsGrade = [((%^PALE:\|%^PALÄ:\|%^PALẸ:\|%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PAL:\|(%^PALÂ:\](%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PALNo:)) ;`

BetweenVowHeightAndMorph = [  (NeutrDiphPALTint (%^Allegro:) %^PAL: |(%^PALÂ: |%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PALNo:) ([(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C: |(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:]|%^C2CC: |%^YXX2YX: |%^K2GG: |%^KK2GG: |%^CC2CCC: |%^CCC2C: |%^CCC2CC: |%^YXX2VX: |%^YXX2VXX: |%^KKK2GG:) (%^PALK:) RBound ] ;


BetweenPALNoAndMorphRightArrow = [([(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C: |(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:]|%^C2CC: |%^YXX2YX: |%^K2GG: |%^KK2GG: |%^CC2CCC: |%^CCC2C: |%^CCC2CC: |%^YXX2VX: |%^YXX2VXX: |%^KKK2GG:) ] ;


BetweenPALNoAndMorph = [([(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C: |(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:]|%^C2CC: |%^YXX2YX: |%^K2GG: |%^KK2GG: |%^CC2CCC: |%^CCC2C: |%^CCC2CC: |%^YXX2VX: |%^YXX2VXX: |%^KKK2GG:) RBound ] ;

BetweenStemAndRightArrow = [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL BetweenPALNoAndMorphRightArrow] ;
!! `BetweenStemAndRightArrow = [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL BetweenPALNoAndMorphRightArrow] ;`

!! ### Penultimate vowel centers possible triggers before VOWLower and VOWRaise

PenNeutrVowLength = [(%^Pen: %^VV2V: |%^Pen: %^V2VV:)] ;
PenNeutrVowHeight = [(%^Pen: %^VOWRaise: |%^Pen: %^VOWLower:)] ;
PenNeutrDiphPALTint = [(%^Pen: %^PALÄ: |%^Pen: %^PALE: |%^Pen: %^PALẸ: |%^Pen: %^PALÕ: |%^Pen: %^PALÂ: |%^Pen: %^PALI:)] ;
PenAllegro = [(%^Pen: %^Allegro: |%^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro: |%^Pen: %^CCC2CAllegro: |%^Pen: %^KK2GAllegro: |%^Pen: %^K2GAllegro:)];

PenBetweenStemAndPALNo = [PenNeutrVowLength PenNeutrVowHeight (%^Pen: %^Allegro:) ] ;

PenNeutrVowLengthHeight  = [ PenNeutrVowLength PenNeutrVowHeight] ;

PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphTint = [PenNeutrVowLength PenNeutrVowHeight PenNeutrDiphPALTint ] ;

PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL = [PenNeutrVowLength PenNeutrVowHeight PenNeutrDiphPALTint (%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PALNo: | %^Pen: %^PAL:) ] ;


PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss = [PenNeutrVowLength [(PenNeutrVowHeight|%^Pen: %^U2Õ:) (PenNeutrDiphPALTint (%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PALNo: | %^Pen: %^PAL:))] ([%^Pen: %^C2CC:]|%^Pen: [(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C: |%^Allegro: |(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:]|%^Pen: %^YXX2YX: |%^Pen: %^CC2CCC: |%^Pen: %^CCC2CC: |%^Pen: %^CCC2C: |%^Pen: %^CC2C: | %^Pen: %^YXX2YX:|%^Pen: %^KK2GG: |%^Pen: %^KKK2GG:) ( %^Pen: %^PALK:)] ;


PenBetweenStemAndStemFinalVoicing = [PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss (%^RmVow: |%^PenVow2a:)] ;
!! `PenBetweenStemAndStemFinalVoicing = [PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss (%^RmVow:\](%^PenVow2a:)) ;`

PenBetweenPALNoAndMorph = [(%^Pen: [(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C: |(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:]|%^Pen: %^C2CC: |%^Pen: %^YXX2YX: |%^Pen: %^KK2GG: |%^Pen: %^CC2CCC: |%^Pen: %^CCC2C: |%^Pen: %^CCC2CC: |%^Pen: %^YXX2VX: |%^Pen: %^YXX2VXX: |%^Pen: %^KKK2GG:) RBound ] ;
!! `PenBetweenPALNoAndMorph = [(%^Pen: [(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C:\|(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:]\|%^Pen: %^C2CC:\|%^Pen: %^YXX2YX:\|%^Pen: %^KK2GG:\|%^Pen: %^CC2CCC:\|%^Pen: %^CCC2C:\|%^Pen: %^CCC2CC:\|%^Pen: %^YXX2VX:\|%^Pen: %^YXX2VXX:\](%^Pen: %^KKK2GG:) RBound ) ;`

!! used in compounding Cmp/SgNom and Cmp/SgGen
SgNomGen = [((%^PALE: %^PAL:) %^CCC2C: |(%^PALE: %^PAL:) %^CCC2CC: |%^PALẸ: |[%^PALE: |%^PALÕ:] %^PAL: %^YXX2IX: |[%^PALẸ: |%^PALE:] %^PAL: %^YXX2YX: |((%^PALE:) %^PAL:) %^KK2GG: |(%^PALE:) %^PAL: | ((%^PALE:) %^PAL:) (%^J2I:) %^CC2C: |%^PAL: %^YXX2VX:)];
!! `SgNomGen = [((%^PALE: %^PAL:) %^CCC2C:\|(%^PALE: %^PAL:) %^CCC2CC:\|%^PALẸ:\|[%^PALE:\|%^PALÕ:] %^PAL: %^YXX2IX:\|[%^PALẸ:\|%^PALE:] %^PAL: %^YXX2YX:\|((%^PALE:) %^PAL:) %^KK2GG:\|(%^PALE:) %^PAL:\| ((%^PALE:) %^PAL:) (%^J2I:) %^CC2C:\](%^PAL: %^YXX2VX:));`


!! neutral to consonant length

CNeutrGrade = [([(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C: |(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:] |[%^C2CC:] |%^CC2CCC: |%^KK2GG: |%^KKK2GG: |%^YXX2VX: |%^YXX2VXX: |%^CCC2CC: )] ;
!! `CNeutrGrade = [([(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C:\|(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:] \|[%^C2CC:] \|%^CC2CCC: \|%^KK2GG: \|%^KKK2GG: \|%^YXX2VX: \|%^YXX2VXX:\](%^CCC2CC: )) ;`

!! neutral to vowel and consonant length

NeutrGrade = [VNeutrGrade |CNeutrGrade] ; 
!! `NeutrGrade = [VNeutrGrade \](CNeutrGrade) ; `

NoVowRaise = \[ %^VOWRaise: | #]* [(∑) #|.#.] ;
!! `NoVowRaise = \[ %^VOWRaise: \| #]* [#\](.#.) ;`

NoCnsDummy = \[ %^CC2C: | %^CCC2C: | %^CCC2CC: | %^YXX2IX: | %^YXX2YX: | %^KK2GG: | %^YXX2VX: | %^KKK2GG: | %^KKK2ZERO: | %^C2CC: | %^J2I: | %^RmCns: | %^K2GG: | # ]* ;
!! `NoCnsDummy = \[ %^CC2C: \| %^CCC2C: \| %^CCC2CC: \| %^YXX2IX: \| %^YXX2YX: \| %^KK2GG: \| %^YXX2VX: \| %^KKK2GG: \| %^KKK2ZERO: \| %^C2CC: \| %^J2I: \| %^RmCns: \| %^K2GG: \]( # )* ;`

SurfaceDiphthong = [ :e :ä | :e :â | :i :õ | :i :â | :i :e | :i :ẹ | :u :â | :u :õ | :u :å | :u :ä | :u :e | :u :ẹ ] ;
!! `SurfaceDiphthong = [ :e :ä \| :e :â \| :i :õ \| :i :â \| :i :e \| :i :ẹ \| :u :â \| :u :õ \| :u :å \| :u :ä \| :u :e \]( :u :ẹ ) ;`

!! * X3 = C Vx Cx Cx     C Vx Vy Cx ˈ Cx
!! * X2 = C Vx Vx Cx Cx  C Vx Vy Cx Cx
!! * X1 = C Vx Vx Cx     C Vx Vy Cx


!! # Rules
Rules

!! ## Vowel shortening rules



"Vowel shortening â:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in
 â:0 <=>
      [â:â|â:õ] _ (i|u) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) (Vow: (0:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) %^Pen:)  %^VV2V:  ;
    [OnSetC|PenUltCns|»]   _ (:ʼ|%{ʼØ%}:) [Cns:+|i: |n j|l m|s k: |s ǩ: |s t|š k: |š ǩ: |š m] PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^RmVow: ;

!Not needed here
!! čââʹđ+N+Sg+Ill: **heart/sydän**
!€  č â ^1VOW:0 đ đ > m a 

    â: _ [c c| č č| k k|s s|š š] %^VV2V: ;

 _ %^UltRmVow: ;
!! -â
  e: _ (:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ: |:ˈ) Cns:+|Cns:+ :ˈ Cns:+]  %^VV2V: ;
!! ǩeʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: **cook/keittää**

!€ ǩ e:i â:0  {ʹØ}:ʹ t t ^VV2V:0 ^VOWRaise:0 ^PALI:0 ^PAL:0
!!€ ǩeâ{ʹØ}tt^VV2V^VOWRaise^PALI^PAL
!!€ ǩi0ʹtt0000


"Vowel shortening ẹ:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
 ẹ:0 <=>
   OnSetC ẹ: _ (u|i) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) (Vow: (0:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) %^Pen:) %^VV2V:  ;
!! teevvad+V+Prt+4:
!€ t ẹ:i ẹ:0 v v ^VV2V:0 ^VOWRaise:0 > u š
!!€ tẹẹvv^VV2V^VOWRaise>uš
!!€ ti0vv00>uš
   ẹ: _ [c c| č č| k k|s s|š š] %^VV2V: ;
    OnSetC _ %^1VOW:0 %{ʹØ%}: Cns:+ %^RmVow: ;!+Err/Orth 20250613

"Vowel shortening e:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
 e:0 <=>
    e:  _ (i|u) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+  (PenUltCns) (Vow: (0:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) %^Pen:) %^VV2V:  ;

!! eʹǩrded+V+Inf
!€ e e:0 ʹ ǩ ǩ:0 e:0 r d ^Pen:0 ^VV2V:0 ^Pen:0 ^CC2C:0 ^RmVow:0 > e d
!!€ eeʹǩǩerd^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2C^RmVow>ed
!!€ e0ʹǩ00rd00000>ed

   [OnSetC|PenUltCns]  _ (0:ʼ|%{ʼØ%}:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+|i: |n j|l m|s ǩ: |s m|s t|š ǩ: |š m] PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^RmVow: ;
!! Ââvel+N+Prop+Sg+Loc  **Ivalo**
!€ Â â v e:0 l ^RmVow:0 > e s t
!!€ Ââvel^RmVow>est
!!€ Ââv0l0>est
  e: _ [c c| č č| k k|s s|š š] %^VV2V: ;

 _ %^UltRmVow: ;


!! Jouste

"Vowel shortening å:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
 å:0 <=>
  å: _ (i|u) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) (Vow: (0:) Cns:+ %^Pen:) %^VV2V:  ;
!  å: _ (i|u) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) (Vow: Cns:+ %^Pen:) %^VV2V:  ;
!! jååʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3 **trekk**
!€ j å:o å:0 {ʹØ}:ʹ t t ^VV2V:0 ^VOWRaise:0 ^PAL:0 > e
!!€ jåå{ʹØ}tt^VV2V^VOWRaise^PAL>e
!!€ jo0ʹtt000>e
!! låʹǧsted

!€ l å å:0 ʹ ǧ ǧ:0 e:0 s t ^Pen:0 ^VV2V:0 ^Pen:0 ^CC2CAllegro:0 ^RmVow:0
!!€ lååʹǧǧest^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2CAllegro^RmVow
!!€ lå0ʹǧ00st00000

!Not needed here
!! sååbbar+N+Sg+Nom **meeting**
!€ s å ^1VOW:å b b a r ^Pen:0 ^V2VV:0
!!€ så^1VOWbbar^Pen^V2VV
!!€ sååbbar00
  å: _ [c c| č č| k k|s s|š š] %^VV2V: ;

 _ %^UltRmVow: ;
!! -å

"Vowel shortening õ:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
 õ:0 <=>
  õ: _ (i|u) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) PenUltCns+ (Vow: (0:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) %^Pen:) %^VV2V:  ;
!€ m õ õ:0 {ʹØ}:ʹ n n ^VV2V:0 ^PAL:0 > e
!!€ mõõ{ʹØ}nn^VV2V^PAL>e
!!€ mõ0ʹnn00>e
!€ m õ õ:0 {ʹØ}:ʹn n ^VV2V:0 ^VOWLower:0 ^PAL:0 > e
!!€ mõõ{ʹØ}nn^VV2V^VOWLower^PAL>e
!!€ mâ0ʹnn000>e
!€ č õ õ:0 n â s t ^Pen:0 ^VV2V:0 ^RmVow:0 > e d
!!€ čõõnâst^Pen^VV2V^RmVow>ed
!!€ čõ0n0st000>ed
  õ: _ (i|u) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ Vow: Cns:+ %^Pen: %^VV2V:  ;
!! tõiŋsǩed+V+Inf
!€ t õ õ:0 i ŋ â:0 s k ^Pen:0 ^VV2V:0 ^RmVow:0 ^PALK:0 > e d
!!€ tõõiŋâsk^Pen^VV2V^RmVow^PALK>ed
!!€ tõ0iŋ0sǩ0000>ed
!$ t õ õ:0 i ŋ â:0 s k ^Pen:0 ^VV2V:0 ^RmVow:0 ^PALK:0 > e d
!!$ tõõiŋâsk^Pen^VV2V^RmVow^PALK>ed
!!$ tõ0iŋ0sk0000>ed

! Is this needed 2016-05-03
      Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)  _ Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^RmVow: ;

!No needed here
!! kõõnjâl+N+Sg+Gen **tear**
!€ k õ ^1VOW:0 n n j â l ^Pen:0 ^VV2V:0 ^Pen:0 ^C2CC:0
!!€ kõ^1VOWnnjâl^Pen^VV2V^Pen^C2CC
!!€ kõ0nnjâl0000
  õ: _ [c c| č č| k k|s s|š š] %^VV2V: ;

 _ %^UltRmVow: ;
!! -õ

"Vowel shortening u:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
 u:0 <=>
  u: _ (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) (Vow: (0:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) %^Pen:) %^VV2V: ;

      Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)  _ Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^RmVow: ;
!! mainstummuš+N+Sg+Ill: **story telling/tarinointi**
!€ m a i n s t u m m u:0 š ^RmVow:0 > a
!!€ mainstummuš^RmVow>a
!!€ mainstumm0š0>a

!Not needed here
!! juurd+N+Ess **thought**
!€ j u ^1VOW:0 r d d > j > e n
!!€ ju^1VOWrdd>j>en
!!€ ju0rdd>j>en
   u: _ [c c| č č| k k|s s|š š] %^VV2V: ;

    _ %^UltRmVow: ;
!! Oulu

"Vowel shortening i:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
 i:0 <=>
    i: _ (u) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^VV2V: ;
    i: _ (u) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) Vow: (0:) Cns:+ (PenUltCns) %^Pen: %^VV2V: ;
!! viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3
!€ v i i {ʹØ}:ʹ k k ^VV2V:0 ^VOWLower:0 ^PAL:0 ^PALK:0 > e
!!€ vii{ʹØ}kk^VV2V^VOWLower^PAL^PALK>e
!!€ ve0ʹǩǩ0000>e
!! viikkâd+V+Imprt+Pl3
!€ v i:ẹ i:0 {ʹØ}:0 k k ^VV2V:0 ^VOWLower:0 > a z
!!€ vii{ʹØ}kk^VV2V^VOWLower>az
!!€ vẹ00kk00>az
!$ v i:ẹ i:ẹ {ʹØ}:ʹ k k  ^VV2V:0 ^VOWLower:0 > a z
!!$ vii{ʹØ}kk^VV2V^VOWLower>az
!!$ vẹẹ0kk00>az
!! iilâsǩ:ilska

        PenUltCns  _ [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ: |s m|s t|š ǩ: |š m] PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^RmVow: ;
!! prääʹzniǩ+N+Sg+Ill: **celebration/juhla**
!€ p r ä ä ʹ z n i:0 ǩ ^RmVow:0 ^PALNo:0 > a
!!€ prääʹzniǩ^RmVow^PALNo>a
!!€ prääʹzn0k00>a

      [Cns: |Vow:] _ (%^RmVow:) %^I2Zero: ;
!€ ž ẹ ẹ v a:0 i:0 ^RmVow:0 ^I2Zero:0 > ǥ a
!!€ žẹẹvai^RmVow^I2Zero>ǥa
!!€ žẹẹv0000>ǥa

          _ %^UltRmVow: ;
!! +Sg+Ill N_HÕʹPPI
!€ h õ ʹ p p i:0 ^UltRmVow:0 > ǥ a
!!€ hõʹppi^UltRmVow>ǥa
!!€ hõʹpp00>ǥa
   i: _ [c c| č č| k k|s s|š š] %^VV2V: ;
